Washington statutes.
RCW 19.162.060

Nonpayment of charges.

An information provider's failure to substantially comply with any of the provisions of RCW 19.162.030 through 19.162.050 is a defense to the nonpayment of charges accrued as a result of using the information provider's services, billed by any entity, including but not limited to telecommunications companies and interexchange carriers.

[ 1991 c 191 s 6.]